District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.19

Expiration of approval of commemorative work.

Approval of a commemorative work pursuant to § 9-204.01, and any easement granted pursuant to the approval, shall expire at the end of a 7-year period beginning on the effective date of the approval unless:

(1)

The Mayor issues a construction permit for the commemorative work during that period; or

(2)

Prior to the end of the 7-year period, the Mayor:

(A)

Determines that all regulatory approvals other than the construction permit for the commemorative work have been obtained and not less than 75% of the amount estimated to be required to construct the commemorative work has been raised; and

(B)

Submits a proposed resolution that is approved by the Council to extend the 7-year authority for the commemorative work for a period not to exceed 3 years, at the end of which period the approval shall expire if a construction permit has not been issued for the commemorative work.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 419
as added Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-275, § 2(d), 48 DCR 1660

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Commemorative Works on Public Space Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-564, January 31, 2001, 48 DCR 1627).